Washington statutes.
RCW 7.36.040

Who may grant writ.

Writs of habeas corpus may be granted by the supreme court, the court of appeals, or superior court, or by any judge of such courts, and upon application the writ shall be granted without delay.

[ 1971 c 81 s 31; 1957 c 9 s 10; Code 1881 s 668; 1877 p 138 s 671; 1869 p 156 s 608; 1854 p 212 s 436; RRS s 1066.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. RAP 16.3, 18.22.